Utah statutes.
26-47-102.   Prescription Drug Assistance Program.
(1)  No later than October 1, 2003, the department shall implement a
Prescription Drug Assistance Program.  The program shall assist persons
seeking information about how to obtain prescription drugs at a reduced price
or no cost.  The program shall:
(a)  collect eligibility and enrollment information about programs that make
prescription drugs available to consumers at a reduced price or no cost;
(b)  provide information collected under Subsection (1)(a) to consumers upon
request via a toll-free phone line, the Internet, and mail;
(c)  inform pharmacists and other health care providers of the Prescription
Drug Assistance Program; and
(d)  assist consumers in completing applications to participate in programs
identified under Subsection (1)(a).
(2)  Any pharmaceutical manufacturer, distributor, or wholesaler operating in
the state shall:
(a)  notify the department of any program operated by it to provide
prescription drugs to consumers at a reduced price or no cost; and
(b)  provide the department with information about eligibility, enrollment,
and benefits.
(3)  Pharmacies, as defined in Title 58, Chapter 17b, Pharmacy Practice Act,
shall notify their patients of the Prescription Drug Assistance Program.  This
notification shall include displaying the program's toll-free number, and may
include distributing a brochure or oral communication.
(4)  The department may accept grants, gifts, and donations of money or
property for use by the Prescription Drug Assistance Program.
(5)  The department shall report to the Health and Human Services Interim
Committee and the Joint Health and Human Services Appropriations Subcommittee
on the performance of the Prescription Drug Assistance Program prior to the
2004 and 2005 Annual General Sessions of the Legislature.
